Washington statutes.
RCW 13.04.005

Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the "basic juvenile court act".

[ 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1977 ex.s. c 291: "Section 57 of this 1977 amendatory act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, the support of state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect on July 1, 1977. The remainder of this 1977 amendatory act shall take effect on July 1, 1978." [ 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 83.]

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 291: "If any provision of this 1977 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 82.]